District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.02a

Immunity for official acts.

Members and staff of the Rental Housing Commission shall not be subject to liability for their official acts. Persons assisting the Rental Housing Commission, whether paid or pro bono, shall not be subject to liability for actions taken to perform services on behalf of the Commission.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 202a
as added Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-327, § 2(b), 58 DCR 14